West Virginia, session 2025, SB374.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. State Auditor. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 22, 2024, authorized under the authority of §6-9-2a of this code, relating to the State Auditor (Local Government Purchasing Card Program, 155 CSR 06), is authorized.